New Jersey, session 222, S4393.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.45:9-5 is amended to read as follows: 45:9-5.          The board shall hold meetings once a month, and shall hold meetings for examinations on the third Tuesday of June and October of each year, which shall be held at the capital of this State and at such other times and places as it may deem expedient.  The secretary and each member of the board, except for the Commissioner of Health or the commissioners designee and the executive department designee who shall serve without compensation pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1971, c.60 (C.45:1-2.2), shall receive [an annual salary as provided by section 45:1-4 of this Title] a salary of $3,000 each month, and each member thereof, including said secretary shall receive the sum of $250.00 for each regular examination so held, which sum shall be paid from the receipts of the board before any unused balances are paid over to the State Treasurer; but if an appropriation is made for the expenses of the board such sums shall be paid from such appropriation.  The board shall keep an official record of all its meetings and an official register of all applicants for a license to practice medicine and surgery in this State. The register shall show the name, age, nativity, last and intended place of residence of each applicant, the time he has spent in obtaining a competent academic and professional education as hereinafter provided, and the names and location of all professional schools or colleges, or examining and licensing boards which have granted the applicant any degree or certificate of attendance upon lectures upon medicine and surgery or State examinations.  The register shall also show whether the applicant was licensed or rejected under this article; if licensed, whether the applicant was examined or licensed without examination, and the register shall be prima facie evidence of all matters therein contained. (cf: P.L.1973, c.187, s.2) 2.    (New section)  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Safety such funds as shall be necessary for the implementation of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), as certified by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.